Utah statutes.
78B-5-303.   Notice of filing.

(1)  The judgment creditor or attorney for the creditor, at the time of filing a foreign judgment, shall file an affidavit with the clerk of the district court stating the last known post-office address of the judgment debtor and the judgment creditor.

(2)  Upon the filing of a foreign judgment and affidavit, the clerk of the district court shall notify the judgment debtor that the judgment has been filed.  Notice shall be sent to the address stated in the affidavit.  The clerk shall record the date the notice is mailed in the register of actions.  The notice shall include the name and post-office address of the judgment creditor and the name and address of the judgment creditor's attorney, if any.

(3)  No execution or other process for the enforcement of a foreign judgment filed under this part may issue until 30 days after the judgment is filed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

